ko: 마우스/트랙볼 기능: AI 기반; 조절식 폴링 속도; 조절식 무게; 양손잡이용 디자인; 맞춤형 RGB 조명; 인체공학적 디자인; 제스처 지원; 초고속 스크롤; 레이저 센서; 짧은 대기 시간; 매크로 기록; 무소음 클릭; 즉각적인 DPI 전환; 온보드 메모리; 광학 센서; 스크롤 휠; 교체 가능한 측면 패널; 촉각 피드백; 엄지받침; 틸트 휠; 기타
pt-PT: Características de rato/trackball: Alimentado por IA; Taxa de votação ajustável; Peso ajustável; Design ambidestro; Iluminação RGB personalizável; Design ergonómico; Suporte a gestos; Rolagem super-rápida; Sensor laser; Baixa latência; Gravação macro; Cliques silenciosos; Troca de DPI instantânea; Memória integrada; Sensor ótico; Roda para deslizar; Painéis laterais trocáveis; Feedback tátil; Apoio de polegar; Roda de inclinação; Outro
en: Mouse/Trackball features: AI-powered; Adjustable polling rate; Adjustable weight; Ambidextrous design; Customizable RGB lighting; Ergonomic design; Gesture support; Hyper fast scrolling; Laser sensor; Low latency; Macro recording; Noiseless clicks; On-the-fly DPI switching; Onboard memory; Optical sensor; Scroll wheel; Swappable side panels; Tactile feedback; Thumb rest; Tilt wheel; Other
bg-BG: Функции на мишка/тракбол: Задвижван от AI; Регулируема честота на опресняване; Регулируемо тегло; Дизайн с двустранна употреба; RGB осветление с възможност за персонализиране; Ергономичен дизайн; Поддръжка на жестове; Свръхбързо превъртане; Лазерен сензор; Ниска латентност; Запис на макроси; Безшумни кликвания; Превключване на DPI в движение; Вградена памет; Оптичен сензор; Колело за превъртане; Сменяеми странични панели; Тактилна обратна връзка; Опора за палеца; Накланящо се колело; Други
ja: マウス/トラックボール機能: AI搭載; 調整可能なポーリングレート; 重量調節可能; 両利き用デザイン; カスタマイズ可能なRGB照明; 人間工学に基づいたデザイン; ジェスチャーサポート; 超高速スクロール; レーザーセンサー; 低遅延; マクロ記録; ノイズレスなクリック音; 即座のDPI切り替え; オンボードメモリー; 光学センサー; スクロールホイール; 交換可能なサイドパネル; 触覚フィードバック; サムレスト; チルトホイール; その他
sl-SI: Funkcije miške/sledilne krogle: Poganja UI; Nastavljiva stopnja izpraševanja; Nastavljiva teža; Ambidekstrozna zasnova; Prilagodljiva RGB osvetlitev; Ergonomska zasnova; Podpora za geste; Izjemno hitro drsenje; Laserski senzor; Nizka latenca; Makro snemanje; Neslišni kliki; Sprotno preklapljanje DPI; Vgrajen pomnilnik; Optični senzor; Drsno kolesce; Zamenljive stranske plošče; Taktilna povratna informacija; Naslon za palec; Nagibno kolo; Drugo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ποντικιού/σφαίρας ελέγχου: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Ρυθμιζόμενος ρυθμός ανίχνευσης; Ρυθμιζόμενο βάρος; Αμφιδέξιος σχεδιασμός; Προσαρμόσιμος φωτισμός RGB; Εργονομικός σχεδιασμός; Υποστήριξη χειρονομιών; Υπερταχεία κύλιση; Αισθητήρας λέιζερ; Χαμηλή καθυστέρηση; Μακροεγγραφή; Αθόρυβα κλικ; Άμεση εναλλαγή DPI; Φερόμενη μνήμη; Οπτικός αισθητήρας; Τροχός κύλισης; Πλευρικά πάνελ με δυνατότητα εναλλαγής; Απτική ανάδραση; Στήριγμα αντίχειρα; Ανακλινόμενος τροχός; Άλλο
lt-LT: Pelės / rutulinio manipuliatoriaus funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; Reguliuojamas atnaujinimo dažnis; Reguliuojamas svoris; Ambidekstrinis dizainas; Keičiamas RGB apšvietimas; Ergonomiškas dizainas; Gestų palaikymas; Itin greitas slinkimas; Lazerinis jutiklis; Maža delsa; Makrokomandų įrašymas; Begarsiai paspaudimai; Greitas DPI perjungimas; Integruota atmintis; Optinis jutiklis; Slinkties ratukas; Keičiamos šoninės plokštės; Liečiamasis atsakas; Nykščio atrama; Pakreipiamas ratukas; Kita
da: Mus-/trackball-funktioner: AI-drevet; Justerbar afstemningshastighed; Justerbar vægt; Ambidekstral design; Brugerdefinerbar RGB-belysning; Ergonomisk design; Gestusunderstøttelse; Hyperhurtig rulning; Lasersensor; Lav latenstid; Makro-optagelse; Støjfri klik; On-the-fly DPI-switching; Indbygget hukommelse; Optisk sensor; Rullehjul; Udskiftelige sidepaneler; Taktil feedback; Tommelfingerstøtte; Vippehjul; Andet
ro-RO: Caracteristici mouse/trackball: Pe bază de AI; Rată de sondare reglabilă; Greutate reglabilă; Design ambidextru; Iluminare RGB personalizabilă; Design ergonomic; Suport gestual; Defilare foarte rapidă; Senzor laser; Latență scăzută; Înregistrare macro; Clicuri fără zgomot; Comutare DPI din mers; Memorie la bord; Senzor optic; Rotiță de defilare; Panouri laterale interschimbabile; Feedback tactil; Suport pentru degetul mare; Roată de înclinare; Altele
pt-BR: Recursos de mouse/trackball: Com IA; Taxa de amostragem ajustável; Peso ajustável; Design ambidestro; Iluminação RGB customizável; Design ergonômico; Suporte a gestos; Rolagem hiper-rápida; Sensor a laser; Baixa latência; Gravação macro; Cliques silenciosos; Troca de DPI instantânea; Memória integrada; Sensor óptico; Rodinha do mouse; Painéis laterais trocáveis; Feedback tátil; Descanso de polegar; Roda de inclinação; Outro
zh-CN: 鼠标/轨迹球特点: AI 赋能; 可调轮询率; 可调重量; 双手通用设计; 可定制 RGB 灯; 符合人体工学设计; 手势支持; 超快速滚动; 激光传感器; 低延迟; 宏录制; 静音鼠标; 高速 DPI 切换; 板载内存; 光学传感器; 滚轮; 可更换侧板; 触觉反馈; 拇指托; 倾斜轮; 其他
sk-SK: Funkcie myši/guličkového ovládača: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Nastaviteľná frekvencia dotazovania; Nastaviteľná hmotnosť; Obojručný dizajn; Prispôsobiteľné RGB osvetlenie; Ergonomický dizajn; Podpora gestami; Hyper rýchle rolovanie; Laserový senzor; Nízka latencia; Makro záznam; Bezhlučné kliknutia; Prepínanie DPI za chodu; Zabudovaná pamäť; Optický senzor; Rolovacie koliesko; Vymeniteľné bočné panely; Hmatová spätná väzba; Opierka palca; Naklápacie koleso; Iné
sv: Detaljer för mus/trackball: AI-driven; Justerbar uppdateringsfrekvens; Justerbar vikt; Ambidextrös design; Anpassningsbar RGB-belysning; Ergonomisk design; Stöd för gester; Hypersnabb bläddring; Lasersensor; Låg latens; Makroinspelning; Ljudlösa klick; DPI-växling i farten; Inbyggt minne; Optisk sensor; Scrollhjul; Utbytbara sidopaneler; Taktil feedback; Tumstöd; Lutningshjul; Annat
fr: Fonctionnalités de la souris/du trackball: Doté d’une IA; Taux d’interrogation réglable; Poids réglable; Design ambidextre; Éclairage RVB personnalisable; Design ergonomique; Prise en charge de la gestuelle; Défilement hyper rapide; Capteur laser; Faible latence; Enregistrement de macros; Clics silencieux; Changement de DPI à la volée; Mémoire embarquée; Capteur optique; Molette de défilement; Panneaux latéraux interchangeables; Retour d’information tactile; Repose-pouce; Roue inclinable; Autre
pl: Charakterystyka myszy/trackballa: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Regulowany wskaźnik odpytywania; Regulowana waga; Oburęczny design; Konfigurowalne oświetlenie RGB; Ergonomiczny kształt; Wsparcie gestów; Super szybkie przewijanie; Czujnik laserowy; Krótki czas oczekiwania; Nagrywanie makr; Bezgłośne kliknięcia; Przełączanie DPI w locie; Wbudowana pamięć; Czujnik optyczny; Pokrętło przewijania; Wymienne panele boczne; Informacja zwrotna dotykowa; Podpora na kciuk; Przechylane koło; Pozostałe
fi: Hiiren/ohjauspallon ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Säädettävä näytteistysnopeus; Säädettävä paino; Molempikätinen muotoilu; Mukautettava RGB-valaistus; Ergonominen muotoilu; Eleiden tuki; Hypernopea vieritys; Laser-anturi; Alhainen viiveaika; Makrotallennus; Äänettömät napsautukset; Nopea DPI-vaihto; Sisäinen muisti; Optinen anturi; Vierityspyörä; Vaihdettavat sivupaneelit; Tuntopalaute; Peukalotuki; Kääntöpyörä; Muu
hu: Egér/hanyattegér jellemzői: AI-alapú; Állítható lekérdezési arány; Állítható súly; Kétoldalú kialakítás; Testreszabható RGB-világítás; Ergonomikus kialakítás; Kézmozdulatok támogatása; Hipergyors görgetés; Lézeres érzékelő; Alacsony késleltetés; Makrórögzítés; Zajtalan kattintások; Menet közbeni DPI-váltás; Beépített memória; Optikai érzékelő; Görgetőkerék; Cserélhető oldallapok; Érintéses visszajelzés; Hüvelykujjtámasz; Dönthető kerék; Egyéb
th: คุณลักษณะของเมาส์/แทร็กบอล: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; อัตราการส่งข้อมูลแบบปรับได้; ปรับน้ำหนักได้; การออกแบบที่รองรับการใช้งานทั้งสองมือ; ไฟ RGB ที่ปรับแต่งได้; การออกแบบตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; รองรับการใช้ท่าทาง; การเลื่อนอย่างรวดเร็วมาก; เซ็นเซอร์เลเซอร์; เวลาแฝงต่ำ; การบันทึกมาโคร; ไร้เสียงคลิก; การสลับ DPI ขณะใช้งาน; หน่วยความจำออนบอร์ด; เซ็นเซอร์ออปติคัล; ล้อเลื่อน; แผงด้านข้างแบบถอดเปลี่ยนได้; การตอบสนองต่อการสัมผัส; ที่วางนิ้วหัวแม่มือ; ล้อเอียง; อื่นๆ
it: Funzionalità del mouse/trackball: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Polling rate regolabile; Peso regolabile; Design ambidestro; Luci RGB personalizzabili; Design ergonomico; Supporto gestuale; Scorrimento iperveloce; Sensore laser; A bassa latenza; Registrazione tramite macro; Clic silenziosi; Commutazione DPI on-the-fly; Memoria di bordo; Sensore ottico; Rotella di scorrimento; Pannelli laterali intercambiabili; Feedback tattile; Appoggia pollice; Ruota inclinabile; Altro
nb: Mus-/styrekulefunksjoner: KI-drevet; Regulerbar avstemningsfrekvens; Regulerbar vekt; Ambidekstrisk design; Tilpassbar RGB-belysning; Ergonomisk design; Støtte for gester; Hyperrask rulling; Lasersensor; Lav ventetid; Makroopptak; Støyfrie klikk; DPI-bytting i farten; Internt minne; Optisk sensor; Rullehjul; Utskiftbare sidepaneler; Taktil tilbakemelding; Tommelstøtte; Vippehjul; Annen
cs: Vlastnosti myši/trackballu: S umělou inteligencí; Nastavitelná polling rate; Nastavitelná hmotnost; Oboustranné provedení; Přizpůsobitelné RGB osvětlení; Ergonomický design; Podpora gest; Hyper rychlé posouvání; Laserový senzor; Nízká latence; Záznam maker; Bezhlučné kliknutí; Přepínání DPI za chodu; Integrovaná paměť; Optický senzor; Skrolovací kolečko; Vyměnitelné boční panely; Hmatová zpětná vazba; Opěrka pro palec; Naklápěcí kolečko; Jiné
ru: Характеристики мыши/трекбола: На базе ИИ; Регулируемая частота опроса; Регулируемый вес; Дизайн для обеих рук; Настраиваемая RGB-подсветка; Эргономичный дизайн; Поддержка жестов; Сверхбыстрая прокрутка; Лазерный датчик; Низкая задержка; Запись макроса; Бесшумные щелчки; Переключение DPI «на лету»; Встроенная память; Оптический датчик; Колесо прокрутки; Сменные боковые панели; Тактильная обратная связь; Упор для большого пальца; Наклонное колесико; Другой
hr-HR: Značajke miša / upravljačke kuglice: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Podesiva stopa anketiranja; Podesiva težina; Ambidekstrozni dizajn; Podesivo RGB osvjetljenje; Ergonomski dizajn; Podrška za pokrete; Hiperbrzo listanje; Laserski senzor; Niska latencija; Snimanje makronaredbi; Bešumni klikovi; Promjena DPI-ja u hodu; Ugrađena memorija; Optički senzor; Kotačić za listanje; Zamjenjivi bočni paneli; Taktilna povratna informacija; Odmor za palac; Nagibni kotačić; Ostalo
nl: Kenmerken muis/trackbal: AI-aangedreven; Instelbare pollingsnelheid; Verstelbaar gewicht; Tweehandig ontwerp; Aanpasbare RGB-verlichting; Ergonomisch ontwerp; Ondersteuning voor bewegingen; Supersnel scrollen; Lasersensor; Lage latentie; Macro-opname; Geruisloze klikken; Snel schakelen tussen DPI's; Intern geheugen; Optische sensor; Scrollwieltje; Verwisselbare zijpanelen; Voelbare feedback; Duimsteun; Kantelwiel; Andere
es: Características del ratón/bola de seguimiento: Con tecnología de IA; Tasa de sondeo regulable; Peso regulable; Diseño ambidiestro; Iluminación RGB personalizable; Diseño ergonómico; Compatibilidad gestual; Desplazamiento hiperrápido; Sensor láser; Baja latencia; Grabación de macros; Clics silenciosos; Cambio de DPI sobre la marcha; Memoria integrada; Sensor óptico; Rueda de desplazamiento; Paneles laterales intercambiables; Retroalimentación táctil; Reposapulgares; Rueda de inclinación; Otros
tr: Fare/İztopu özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Ayarlanabilir bilgi alışverişi hızı; Ayarlanabilir ağırlık; Her iki elle kullanılabilen tasarım; Özelleştirilebilir RGB aydınlatma; Ergonomik tasarım; Hareket desteği; Aşırı hızlı kaydırma; Lazer sensörü; Düşük gecikmeli; Makro kaydı; Sessiz tıklama; Çalışma sırasında DPI değişimi; Yerleşik bellek; Optik sensör; Kaydırma tekerleği; Değiştirilebilir yan paneller; Dokunsal geri bildirim; Başparmak desteği; Eğimli tekerlek; Diğer
zh-TW: 滑鼠/軌跡球功能: AI 驅動; 輪詢率可調; 重量可調; 雙手通用設計; 可客製化 RGB 燈光; 人體工學設計; 支援手勢; 超快速滾動; 雷射感測器; 低延遲; 巨集錄製; 靜音點擊設計; 即時 DPI 切換; 板載記憶體; 光學感測器; 滾輪; 可更換側板; 觸覺回饋; 拇指托; 傾斜輪; 其他
de: Maus-/Trackball-Funktionen: KI-gestützt; Einstellbare Abfragerate; Einstellbares Gewicht; Beidhändiges Design; Anpassbare RGB-Beleuchtung; Ergonomisches Design; Gestenunterstützung; Hyperschneller Bildlauf; Lasersensor; Geringe Latenz; Makroaufnahme; Geräuschlose Klicks; DPI-Umschaltung im laufenden Betrieb; Onboard-Speicher; Optischer Sensor; Scrollrad; Austauschbare Seitenteile; Taktiles Feedback; Daumenauflage; Kipprad; Sonstiges
vi: Tính năng chuột/bi xoay: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Có thể điều chỉnh tần suất gửi tín hiệu; Điều chỉnh được trọng lượng; Thiết kế thuận cả hai tay; Ánh sáng RGB có thể tùy chỉnh; Thiết kế tiện dụng; Hỗ trợ cử chỉ; Cuộn siêu nhanh; Cảm biến laze; Độ trễ thấp; Ghi lại macro; Không phát ra tiếng nhấp chuột; Chuyển đổi DPI nhanh chóng; Bộ nhớ tích hợp; Cảm biến quang học; Bánh xe cuộn; Các tấm bên thay đổi; Phản hồi xúc giác; Tựa ngón cái; Bánh xe nghiêng; Khác